California, session 20252026, AB2614.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11765 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:11765. (a) This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Body Brokering and Patient Referral Integrity Act.(b) For the purposes of this section, “residential treatment facility” includes any sober living home, group home, recovery residence, residential care facility, or similar facility providing housing or residential services, whether licensed or unlicensed, in connection with alcohol or substance use disorder treatment or behavioral health recovery.(c) It is unlawful for any person, to offer, pay, solicit, or receive a commission, benefit, bonus, rebate, bribe, or any other form of remuneration or to engage in any split-fee arrangement to induce a referral to a residential treatment facility or in return for acceptance of an individual into a residential treatment facility.(d) It is unlawful for a person to aid, abet, advise, or participate in the conduct prohibited in this section.(e) A violation of this section is misdemeanor.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.